Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2811
Health care, defined.

Health care shall mean any act or treatment performed or furnished, or which should have been performed or furnished, by any health care provider for, to, or on behalf of a patient during the patient's care, treatment, or confinement.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 11.